Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2027YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 427 Section 1. MEDICAID ââ MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION COVERAGE 1 OF POWER STANDING DEVICE EQUIPMENT ON POWER WHEELCHAIRS. The 2 department of health and human services shall require all 3 Medicaid managed care organizations contracting with the 4 department, upon the request of a Medicaid recipient, to 5 cover the costs of power standing device equipment on power 6 wheelchairs as reasonable and medically necessary for the 7 recipientâs independence, function, health, and well-being, 8 if the Medicaid recipient is determined by the department to 9 have a permanent physical disability. For the purposes of this 10 section, âpower standing device equipmentâ means a standing 11 feature integrated into a wheelchair base that allows the user 12 to obtain a standing position without the need to transfer from 13 the wheelchair. 14